Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 3

Common Enclosures

44-8-301. Damages for failure to keep up fences, or for trespass.

It is lawful for two (2) or more owners of adjoining farms to enclose the same under one (1) common fence or enclosure, to be kept up to the standard of a lawful fence by each owner upon that owner's own land, or in such manner and proportion as the owners may agree upon in writing. In the absence of an agreement, the owner of any of the land embraced in the common fence shall be liable to the owners of the other lands and their tenants for all damages to their lands, pastures, fruit trees, crops, or vegetables, occasioned by the failure or neglect of the other owner to keep and maintain the common fence on that owner's land up to the standard of a lawful fence, or by the owner's own stock or that of the owner's tenants trespassing beyond the owner's own land within the common enclosure.

Acts 1875, ch. 64, § 2; 1897, ch. 48, § 1; Shan., § 3001a1; Code 1932, § 5216; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1715, 44-9-301.

Cross-References. Cattle guards, title 65, ch. 6, part 3.

Cited: Porter v. Poole, 8 Tenn. App. 453, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 161 (1928).

44-8-302. Common enclosure of lands under written agreements — Specifications.

It is lawful to prescribe, in such an agreement, the means and method by which the common enclosure shall be constructed and maintained, regulations for the use and enjoyment by each owner of the lands embraced in the enclosure, the penalties to be imposed upon each for violations and how the penalties shall be imposed, the mode of assessment of damages occasioned by trespassing stock of the parties to the agreement, and the length of time it shall continue in force. The agreement may also provide for impounding, feeding, and caring for trespassing stock of the parties to the agreement found within the common enclosure, and for a lien upon trespassing stock to secure the penalties and damages assessed against the owner on that account, and for the enforcement of the lien by sale. All such provisions, not in violation of any law, shall be binding upon all parties to the agreement.

Acts 1897, ch. 48, § 2; Shan., § 3001a2; Code 1932, § 5217; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1716, 44-9-302.

44-8-303. Force and binding power of agreement.

Any such agreement shall continue in force and be binding upon all the parties to the agreement and their heirs and devisees, for the period prescribed in the agreement, unless rescinded by mutual consent. The agreement may be modified or amended in writing signed by all the parties, at any time. After the expiration of the period prescribed, the agreement shall be deemed continued by unanimous consent, unless between November 1 and January 1, some party to the agreement or the party's heir or devisee gives notice in writing to all the other parties to the agreement, resident in the county, of the party's intention to terminate the agreement, in which event the agreement shall terminate at the expiration of ninety (90) days from the service of the notice.

Acts 1897, ch. 48, § 3; 1901, ch. 161, § 1; Shan., § 3001a3; Code 1932, § 5218; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1717, 44-9-303.

44-8-304. Agreement if registered is binding on purchaser, his heirs and assigns.

The agreement may be acknowledged and registered in the county or counties in which the lands and any part of the lands are situated.

In case of registration, the agreement shall be binding upon any purchaser of any of the lands embraced in the common enclosure, and the purchaser's heirs and assigns, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the purchaser had been an original party to the agreement.

Acts 1897, ch. 48, § 4; Shan., § 3001a4; Code 1932, § 5219; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1718, 44-9-304.

44-8-305. Liability of persons not parties to agreement for trespass by stock.

Any person not a party to the agreement whose stock trespasses upon the common enclosure shall be liable to the injured party for all damages that the person sustains, and the party so damaged has all the rights and liens given by law to persons damaged by stock trespassing upon enclosures that are not common; provided, the common enclosure is at the time a lawful enclosure or fence.

Acts 1897, ch. 48, § 5; Shan., § 3001a5; Code 1932, § 5220; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1719, 44-9-305.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 9.